Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. RECORDS

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY RECORDS

CHAPTER 193. RECORDING AND INDEXING BY COUNTIES

Sec. 193.001. MANNER OF RECORDING. (a) The county clerk shall record instruments filed for recording in the order that they are filed. The clerk shall record each instrument with any acknowledgment, proof, affidavit, or certificate that is attached to it.

(b) The clerk shall note at the foot of the record the date and time that the instrument was filed for recording, but if the instrument was recorded electronically the clerk may note on the first page of the instrument the recording information, including the date and time.

(c) If an instrument that is filed for recording is acknowledged or proved in the manner prescribed by law for record, the clerk shall make a record of the names of the parties to the instrument in alphabetical order, the date of the instrument, the nature of the instrument, and the time that the instrument was filed. If required, the clerk shall give the person who files the instrument a receipt stating this information.

(d) The clerk shall certify under the clerk's signature and seal of office the date and time that the instrument is recorded and the specific location in the records at which the instrument is recorded. After recording the instrument, the clerk shall deliver the instrument to the person who is entitled to it.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 86 (S.B. 580), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2007.

Sec. 193.002. CLASSIFICATION AND INDEX OF RECORDS NOT ON MICROFILM. (a) A county clerk or clerk of a county court who does not maintain records on microfilm as provided by Chapter 204 and rules adopted under that chapter may divide the instruments received for filing, registering, or recording into the seven classes provided by Section 193.008(b) and may consolidate records in the manner provided by Section 193.008(d).

(b) Classes of records maintained as provided by this section shall be indexed and cross-indexed, to the extent practicable, as required by Sections 193.009, 193.010, and 193.011.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.003. INDEX TO REAL PROPERTY RECORDS. (a) The county clerk shall maintain an alphabetical index to all recorded deeds, powers of attorney, mortgages, correction instruments, findings of fact and conclusions of law entered under Section 5.0261, Property Code, and other instruments relating to real property. The index must state the specific location in the records at which the instruments are recorded.

(b) The index must be a cross-index that contains the names of the grantors and grantees in alphabetical order. If a deed is made by a sheriff, the index entry must contain the name of the sheriff and the defendant in execution. If a deed is made by an executor, administrator, or guardian, the index entry must contain the name of that person and the name of the person's testator, intestate, or ward. If a deed is made by an attorney, the index entry must contain the name of the attorney and the attorney's constituents. If a deed is made by a commissioner or trustee, the index entry must contain the name of the commissioner or trustee and the name of the person whose estate is conveyed. The index entry for a correction instrument must contain the names of the grantors and grantees as stated in the correction instrument. The index entry for a finding of fact and conclusion of law entered under Section 5.0261, Property Code, must contain the names of the grantors and grantees as stated in the subject conveyance instrument. The index entry for a paper document described by Section 12.0011(b)(3), Property Code, must contain the names of the grantors and grantees.

(c) This section does not apply to records classified and indexed in the manner required for records on microfilm by Sections 193.008 and 193.009.

(d) In this section, "correction instrument" means an instrument correcting an ambiguity or error in a recorded original instrument of conveyance to transfer real property or an interest in real property as described by Section 5.028 or 5.029, Property Code.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 189 (S.B. 584), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 678 (S.B. 2128), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 532 (S.B. 30), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 193.004. INDEX TO JUDGMENTS. (a) The county clerk shall maintain a well-bound alphabetical index to all suits filed in the county court. The index must be a cross-index that states in full and in alphabetical order the names of the parties to a filed suit. The index must state opposite each name the specific location in the records at which the judgment in the case is recorded.

(b) This section does not apply to records classified and indexed in the manner required for records on microfilm by Sections 193.008 and 193.009.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 56, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.005. INDEXES TO OTHER RECORDS. (a) In a manner similar to that by which the index to real property records is maintained, the county clerk shall maintain an alphabetical index to all recorded instruments relating to goods, chattels, and other personal property, marriage contracts, and other instruments authorized or permitted to be recorded in the clerk's office.

(b) The clerk also shall maintain a similar index of the records of official bonds. The index for official bonds must include the names of the officers appointed, the names of the obligors on the recorded bonds, and a reference to the specific location in the records where the bonds are recorded.

(c) This section does not apply to records classified and indexed in the manner required for records on microfilm by Sections 193.008 and 193.009.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.007. TRANSLATION OF COUNTY RECORDS. (a) The commissioners court of a county may require the county clerk to have translated into English and recorded all or part of a county record or archive that is written in Spanish and that relates to a title to real property.

(b) The court may not contract to pay more than 15 cents for each 100 words for the translation and the recording.

(c) An English translation prepared and recorded under this section has the same effect as if the instrument were originally written in English. A person may use a certified copy of the English translation for all purposes for which the original instrument or a certified copy of the original instrument may be used.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 85(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 85(4), eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.008. CLASSIFICATION OF RECORDS ON MICROFILM. (a) If a county clerk or clerk of a county court chooses to maintain records on microfilm as provided by Chapter 204 and rules adopted under that chapter, the clerk shall divide the instruments received for filing, registering, or recording into seven classes for recording on microfilm.

(b) The seven classes of microfilm records are:

(1) records relating to real property, known as "Official Public Records of Real Property";

(2) records relating to receivables, chattels, and personal property, known as "Official Public Records of Personal Property and Chattels";

(3) records relating to probate matters, known as "Official Public Records of Probate Courts";

(4) records relating to county civil court matters, known as "Official Public Records of County Civil Courts";

(5) records relating to county criminal court matters, known as "Official Public Records of County Criminal Courts";

(6) records relating to matters in the commissioners court, known as "Official Public Records of Commissioners Court"; and

(7) records relating to an individual, a business entity, or a governmental agency, other than a property record or a court record, known as "Official Public Records of Governmental, Business, and Personal Matters."

(c) The clerk shall record each class of record on a separate series of rolls of microfilm or in a separate series of discrete groups of discrete microfilm images. Each roll of microfilm or separate series of groups of microfilm images is considered to be a bound volume or book.

(d) The clerk may consolidate the records described by Subsections (b)(1) and (7) into a single class known as "Official Public Records."

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.009. INDEXING OF RECORDS ON MICROFILM. (a) An instrument that is recorded and classified on microfilm as provided by Section 193.008 must be alphabetically indexed and cross-indexed in the indexes to that official public record under the names of the parties identified in the instrument.

(b) The index entry for an instrument recorded in the official public records of real property, personal property and chattels, or governmental, business, and personal matters must give:

(1) the names of the parties to the instrument;

(2) a brief description of the nature of the instrument;

(3) the date of filing;

(4) a brief description of the property, if any; and

(5) the location of the microfilm image of the instrument by roll or group number and by image number, or by another suitable method permissible under rules adopted under Chapter 204.

(c) The index entry for an instrument recorded in the official public records of probate courts, county civil courts, county criminal courts, or the commissioners court must give information that would assist in further identifying the cause or action, including:

(1) the names of the parties to the action, except an action in the commissioners court;

(2) the nature of the cause or action;

(3) the date the cause or action was opened or taken;

(4) the court in which the cause or action lies;

(5) the docket number; and

(6) the location of the microfilm image of the instrument by roll or group number and by image number, or by another suitable method permissible under rules adopted under Chapter 204.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.010. REVISION OF INDEXES OF RECORDS ON MICROFILM. (a) The indexes must be periodically revised throughout the year to obtain a complete alphabetical index to each of the classes of official public records for each calendar year.

(b) The clerk may not make a marginal entry to a previously completed index.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.011. REGISTERS OF COURT RECORDS ON MICROFILM. (a) A current register of court docket numbers must be maintained in numerical order for each type of court record included in an official public record.

(b) An entry in a register maintained under this section must include essentially the same information as is included in the equivalent index entry under Section 193.009.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.012. RETURN OF ORIGINAL INSTRUMENTS. After an original instrument that is not involved in or related to a court matter or proceeding has been microfilmed and the microfilm has satisfied the requirements of Chapter 204 and rules adopted under that chapter, the county clerk shall return the original instrument to the person who filed it for record.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 193.013. COMPUTERIZED INDEX FOR CERTAIN RECORDS. An index for a record listed in Section 193.008(b) may be stored or maintained by computer if a security or backup copy of the index is created on a daily basis and stored in a climate-controlled location that is equipped with fire alarms and sprinklers. The storage location must be separate from the building in which the computer is located.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1064, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1989. Renumbered from Sec. 194.0065 and amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.06(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.